Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-610
Remedies; not exclusive.

Nothing in the Invention Development Services Disclosure Act shall limit any obligations, rights, or remedies that might otherwise be applicable or available under the law of this state.

Laws 1991, LB 96, § 10.